North Dakota, session 69, SB2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 43-33-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. "Board" means the board of hearing aid specialistshas the meaning provided under
section 43 - 37 - 02 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 43-33-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The board shall register each applicant without discrimination if the applicant passes
an examination as provided in section 43-33-07 or if the applicant is a licensed
audiologist under chapter 43 - 37 , and upon the applicant's payment of a fee as
established by the board, shall issue to the applicant a license signed by the secretary
of the board. The license is effective until the expiration date stated on the license and
identification card.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 43-37-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. "Board" means the state board of examiners on audiology andaudiologists,
speech-language pathologypathologists, and hearing aid specialists.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 43-37-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0036.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
43-37-05. Board of examiners on audiology andaudiologists, speech-language
pathologypathologists, and hearing aid specialists.
1. The board of examiners on audiology andaudiologists, speech-language pathology is
herebypathologists, and hearing aid specialists is established to carry out this chapter
and chapter 43 - 33 .
2. The board is composed of eightnine members appointed by the governor. Appointees
must be residents of this state for at least one year immediately preceding
appointment and, except for the consumer member, must be engaged in rendering
services to the public, teaching, or research in audiology or speech-language
pathology for at least three years preceding appointment. Two board members must
be audiologists, fourtwo must be speech-language pathologists, two must be hearing
aid specialists who have at least five years of relevant experience in the state and are
not audiologists or otolaryngologists, one must be an otolaryngologist, and onetwo
must be a consumerconsumers.
3. Each board member shall hold office for three years and until a successor is appointed
and qualified. The terms must be arranged so no more than four terms expire on July
first of each year. The governor shall fill vacancies for an unexpired term. An individual
may not serve more than two successive terms.
4. The board shall meet at least twice each calendar year. Special meetings may be
convened at the call of the chairman or at the written request of any three board
members.
5. Five members of the board constitute a quorum. When an application for licensure is
received, one member of the quorum must be engaged in the profession for which a
license is sought. In the case of an application for licensure as a speech-language
pathology assistant, a speech-language pathologist must be a member of the quorum.
SECTION 5. REPEAL. Sections 43-33-15 and 43-33-17 of the North Dakota Century Code
are repealed.
Page No. 2 25.0036.01000